Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.760

Intent—2021 c 64.

It is the intent of the legislature that Washington retain and build on its leadership in the manufacturing and research and development sectors. The legislature finds that a thriving research and production sector are complimentary and should be promoted in every region of the state. The legislature finds this is critical to provide a strong, resilient tax base for good schools, safe streets, and community optimism. Therefore, the legislature intends to identify and invest in strategies to ensure every geographic region of the state can benefit from a strong manufacturing and research and development base, with the goal of doubling the state's manufacturing employment base, the number of small businesses, and the number of women and minority-owned manufacturing businesses in the next 10 years.

[ 2021 c 64 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 64: "This act may be known and cited as the Washington BEST manufacturing act." [ 2021 c 64 s 1.]